District of Columbia statutes.
44-2002

Repealed

Office of Health Systems Development; establishment and functions.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 3, 39 DCR 9195
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 808, 42 DCR 3684
See notes following § 44-2001.
1981 Ed., § 32-322.